Utah statutes.
38-9a-205.   Remedies -- Actions arising from injunctions -- Attorney fees.

(1)  The remedies provided in this chapter for enforcement of the orders of the court are in addition to any other civil and criminal remedies available.

(2)  The district court shall hear and decide all matters arising pursuant to this chapter.

(3)  After a hearing with notice to the affected party, the court may enter an order requiring any party to pay the costs of the action, including reasonable attorney's fees.



Enacted by Chapter 93, 2005 General Session

